tests/infixes08.aff
# infixes (see manual)
NEEDAFFIX X
# use of two infixes rules with NEEDAFFIX
# not work
SFX H Y 1
SFX H i.. u..able/XD .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D .r un.x .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I .r un.x .

PFX J Y 1
PFX J ..i un..i .

SFX K Y 1
SFX K n. o.able/XJ .

SFX L Y 1
SFX L n. o.able .
